California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) Holds a professional credential, license, or masters degree in psychology, social work, special education, physical education, recreation therapy, vocational education, counseling, early childhood education, or child development, and has completed six semester units of administration and supervision of early childhood education or child development programs, or both.

(c) Was employed prior to January 1, 1993, as a teacher or program director in a child care and development program that provides services to severely disabled children.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10382.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a high school student or any other adult shall be selected by the governing board of a public or private agency as defined in Section 10221 to serve as nonteaching personnel to perform noninstructional work. A career ladder shall be utilized in the employment and promotion of such noninstructional personnel. Each such person shall have had a health examination made within the 12-month period preceding the date of employment. Each person shall also submit duplicate personal identification cards upon which shall appear legible fingerprints and a personal description of the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10382.5.

The same fee as that prescribed for a credential provided in Section 44235 of the Education Code shall be charged for either the issuance or renewal of each child development permit authorizing service in the supervision and instruction of children in child development programs or authorizing service as a supervisor in a program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.

The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall by rule or regulation establish the requirements for the following:

(a) The issuance and the renewal of permits authorizing service in the care, development, and instruction of children in child care and development programs, as well as the issuance of emergency permits for this purpose.

(b) The issuance and renewal of permits authorizing supervision of a child care and development program, as well as the issuance of emergency permits for this purpose.

(c) The periods of duration of the permits set forth in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 10380 and 10383, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing may issue an assistant teacher permit that authorizes the permitholder to assist in the care, development, and instruction of children, subject to the supervision requirements described in subdivision (b). This assistance may include temporarily supervising children independently for no more than 120 minutes per day while the supervising employee leaves the classroom for purposes of offering flexibility for classroom support, during breaks, or escorting children outside of the classroom. The commission may issue a permit under this section provided
 that all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The applicant has at least six units from an accredited institution of higher education in early childhood education, child development, or human development, or a combination thereof.

(2) The applicant has an education plan updated each academic year and is enrolled in a course or courses to meet the requirements for the next level permit.

(3) The applicant is sponsored by an employer who has a current contract with the State Department of Social Services to be a child development program provider.

(b) An employee who holds an assistant teacher permit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be under the
 supervision of an employee who holds a valid commission-issued child development permit at the teacher level, or at an equivalent or higher permit level.

(c) A contracting agency that employs a person who holds an assistant teacher permit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall maintain a copy of the permitholder’s current education plan in their employee file.

(d) A permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be valid for no more than two years from the date of issuance and shall not be renewed.

(e) The number of assistant teacher permitholders employed by a contracting agency at one site shall not exceed 50 percent of the number of classrooms at that site. The contracting agency shall not assign more than one assistant teacher to each classroom.

(f) This section shall not be construed to grant to a person issued with an assistant teacher permit pursuant to this section with the rights and responsibilities of an associate teacher permitholder, or equivalent permitholder, or higher permitholder.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of childcare bulletins or similar instructions until regulations are adopted.

(h) The commission shall implement this section by no later than January 30, 2026.

(i) This section shall become inoperative one year after the implementation of the commission’s revised child development permit matrix, or January 1, 2029, whichever is later, and, as of that date, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 165, Sec. 5.   (AB 753)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Conditionally repealed on or after January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.5.

Notwithstanding Section 10383 of this code or Section 80111 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, on or before April 30, 2025, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall, by rule or regulation, authorize a holder of a Child Development Associate Teacher Permit to renew their permit without a limitation on the number of renewals if the permitholder completes specified hours of professional growth activities, as determined by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 1930)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10384.5.

Each county board of education, city and county board of education, or community college governing board may issue temporary certificates for the purpose of authorizing salary payments to child development employees whose child development permit applications are being processed. The applicant for the temporary certificate shall make a statement under oath that the employee has duly filed their application for a permit, together with the required fee, and that to the best of their knowledge no reason exists why the employee should not be issued a permit. The temporary certificate shall be valid for not more than 90 schooldays and only until the permit originally requested is either issued or denied by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 471, Sec. 29.   (SB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10385.

(a) A person employed by a public or private agency in a position requiring a child development permit for the supervision and instruction of children, or for service as a physician, dentist, or nurse, or in the supervision of the child development program, shall be deemed to be employed in a position requiring certification qualifications.

(b) Each other person employed by an agency in a child development program under the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed for all purposes, including retirement, to be a person employed by the agency in a position not requiring certification qualifications.

(c) A district may lay off an employee required to have such a permit at any
 time during the school year for lack of work or lack of funds or may provide for the employee’s employment for not to exceed 90 days in any one school year on an intermittent basis which shall not be deemed probationary service. The order of layoff shall be determined by length of service. The employee who has served the shortest time shall be laid off first, except that no permanent employee shall be laid off ahead of a probationary employee. A permanent employee who has been laid off shall hold reinstatement rights for a period of 39 months from the date of layoff.

(d) Service performed prior to September 18, 1959, shall not be included in computing the service required as a prerequisite for attainment of, or eligibility to, classification as a permanent child development employee.

(e) A person who is employed by an agency as a probationary employee in a position requiring a
 child development permit for the supervision and instruction of children, or for service as a physician, dentist, or nurse, or in the supervision of the children’s program and who has served in such a position for three complete consecutive school years as defined in Section 44908 or 87468 and Section 44975 of the Education Code or Section 87776 of the Education Code immediately prior to September 18, 1959, may be dismissed only in accordance with the provisions of Section 44949 or 87740 of the Education Code.

(f) Other persons who are employed as probationary employees in positions requiring such permits on or after September 18, 1959, may be dismissed in accordance with the provisions of Section 44949 or 87740 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10387.

Every employee of a child development program who before their employment in the program was employed by the agency maintaining such program in a position entitling the employee to membership in, and who was a member of, the retirement system maintained by such district, and if such employee’s contributions to such retirement system were returned to the employee when the employee was employed in the program, such employee shall have the right to elect, by written document filed with the Board of Administration, Public Employees’ Retirement System, at any time within 90 days after the date upon which the notice of the right to make such election is mailed by such system, either to the member’s latest address on file in the office of such system, or to the office of the governing board of such agency or agencies, and prior to
 the date of retirement, to contribute to such system, subject to minimum payments fixed by the Board of Administration, and in one or more sums, or in not to exceed 60 monthly payments, an amount which, when added to the employee’s accumulated contributions, including interest, transferred as required in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 24810 of the Education Code, will make a total amount equal to the accumulated contributions, including interest, which would have been credited to the employee in such plan, if the employee had never had their contributions returned to them. Such employee shall pay to the Public Employees’ Retirement System interest on the unpaid balance of the amount payable to such system, beginning with the date of transfer, at the rate of interest currently used from time to time under the system. If such employee elects to make, and makes, such contributions and pays such interest, but not otherwise, the employee shall receive credit under such employees’ system, as state
 service, for all prior service rendered while the employee was not a member of such plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10387.5.

The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall establish standards for the issuance of the permits herein provided for. The standards may be changed from time to time, but changes therein shall not affect then valid permits issued to persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 22.5. Fraud and Overpayments [10388. - 10388.]

10388.

(a) (1) The State Department of Education, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, county fraud investigators, and other fraud investigation experts, shall perform an error rate study to estimate the percentage of errors, including, but not limited to, overpayments and fraud, in determinations of eligibility, the need for childcare pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 8208 of the Education Code, family fees, and reimbursement payments to childcare providers, including, but not limited to, authorized hours of care and the use of adjustment factors, in programs operated pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225) and Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370). The study shall include, but not be limited to, an analysis of a statistically valid, random, sample of family files and reimbursement payments that have been processed over a specified time. Each payment from the sample shall be audited to determine whether it was correctly paid or paid in error. Those payments identified as being paid in error shall be classified based on the type of the error that occurred, including, but not limited to, administrative errors, overpayment caused by providers, overpayments caused by parents, provider fraud, and beneficiary fraud.

(2) In conducting the compliance reviews required by regulations of the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to Section 10267.5 for programs operated pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240), the State Department of Education shall survey a statistically valid sample of files for the program and identify and report the errors, by category, resulting from that survey.

(3) The State Department of Education shall report in writing to the Governor, the Chair of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the chairs of the fiscal committees for both houses of the Legislature, and the Department of Finance, information regarding the error rate study by April 1, 2005. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The results of the error rate study.

(B) Fraud and overpayment reduction targets that have been established based on the data from the error rate study.

(C) The timeframe for achieving the targets.

(D) Recommendations developed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The State Department of Education shall develop recommendations for the prevention and elimination of childcare fraud and programmatic errors and the identification and collection of childcare overpayments. The recommendations shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Precise definitions of what constitutes childcare fraud and overpayments.

(2) A consistent statewide system to identify fraud and overpayments.

(3) A consistent statewide system of standards for fraud prevention, intervention, and overpayment collection that is applied to all childcare program provider categories.

(4) Statewide fraud and overpayment measures that will be reported annually by the department.

(5) Standards for independent financial compliance audits, including provisions to ensure that small programs are not unduly burdened.

(6) Consistent statewide mechanisms for due process for parents.

(7) Consistent statewide mechanisms for dispute resolution for childcare programs and providers.

(8) Assessment of the cost-effectiveness of prevention and intervention activities.

(9) Equitable treatment of all consumers of subsidized childcare.

(10) Consideration of the need to minimize new barriers to family access to childcare.

(11) A survey of best practices from both California agencies and providers and from other states.

(c) In developing its recommendations, the State Department of Education shall place priority on prevention of fraud and overpayments, and shall consider existing best practices for doing so. The State Department of Education shall make any identified best practices available on its internet website by March 1, 2005.

(d) The State Department of Education shall consult with representatives of the State Department of Social Services, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the Department of Finance, staff from the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature, and other interested parties including, but not limited to, childcare consumers and providers, representatives from county welfare departments, district attorneys, county special investigative units, and legal advocacy organizations representing consumers in developing these recommendations.

(e) The State Department of Education shall report its recommendations directly to the respective policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by April 1, 2005.

(f) (1) On or after July 1, 2005, all childcare contracts entered into by the State Department of Social Services for means-tested childcare programs, including, but not limited to, the programs described in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235), Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240), Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250), Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260), and Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370), shall require adoption in contractor policies and implementation of best practices on prevention and intervention of fraud and program integrity violations, as determined by the State Department of Social Services.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 10271, the best practices described in paragraph (1) shall require childcare contractors to terminate eligibility if there is substantiated evidence of a fraud or program integrity violation that invalidates the certification.

(g) (1) The State Department of Social Services may
 enter into agreements with county welfare departments to support the investigation and enforcement of fraud and program integrity in any subsidized childcare program administered by the department, inclusive of licensed and license-exempt providers.

(2) Any agreements entered into pursuant to this subdivision shall describe how the State Department of Social Services may furnish or require the disclosure of information to the extent required to investigate and pursue claims related to fraud or program integrity.

(h) The State Department of Social Services may clarify the process for recovery of funds and imposition of sanctions described in the approved state plan
 under the federal Child Care and Development Fund in instances where fraud or other program integrity violation is established. For purposes of this section, “Child Care and Development Fund” has the same meaning as in Section 98.2 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(i) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement and administer the changes made to this section by the act that added this subdivision by all-county letters, bulletins, contract provisions, or similar written instructions until regulations are adopted. The department shall initiate a rulemaking action to adopt regulations to implement this section no later than July 1,
 2030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 36.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 23. Administrative Review [10390. - 10402.]

10390.

It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize an appeal process for the resolution of disputes between the department and local agencies which contract with the department to provide child care and development services or to furnish property, facilities, personnel, supplies, equipment and administrative services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10391.

(a) The department shall provide an internal appeal procedure to resolve a dispute between the department and a contracting agency providing child care and development services pursuant to Section 10268.5 regarding the interpretation or application of a term or condition of a contract, or to dispute a finding made by the department resulting from a fiscal or programmatic review, including, but not limited to, an error rate notification.

(b) A contracting agency shall have the right to appeal the findings of a fiscal or programmatic review, including, but not limited to, an error rate finding, by submitting a request for appeal in accordance with the internal appeal procedure developed by the department pursuant to subdivision
 (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10392.

(a) The department shall provide an independent appeal procedure to each contracting agency providing child care and development services pursuant to Section 10268.5 that shall be conducted by the Office of Administrative Hearings and shall be provided upon an appeal petition of the contracting agency in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Termination of a contracting agency’s contract.

(2) Denial of more than 4 percent or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), whichever is less, of a local contracting agency’s contracted payment for services schedule.

(3) Demand for remittance of an overpayment of more
 than 4 percent or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), whichever is less, of a local contracting agency’s annual contract.

(b) Before filing an appeal petition for an action taken pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a), the contracting agency shall have submitted all previously required standard monthly or quarterly reporting forms to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10393.

All hearings required by Section 10392 shall be conducted according to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except as otherwise directed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10394.

The Office of Administrative Hearings shall, by June 30, 1982, adopt regulations governing the hearings, which shall include all of the following:

(a) Deadlines for filing petitions, commencing hearings and rendering decisions.

(b) Notice to affected parties.

(c) The manner for maintaining appropriate provision for electronic recording and transcription, if necessary.

(d) Hearings shall be conducted at the offices of the Office of Administrative Hearings in Sacramento or Los Angeles. However, hearings in Los Angeles shall be available only to local contracting agencies
 with the department whose annual contracts total less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(e) Any other issues deemed appropriate by the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10395.

The determination of the hearing examiner shall be the final administrative determination to be afforded the local contracting agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10396.

All actions by the department, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 10392 shall be preceded by a written notice of action to the local contracting agency which shall include the following:

(a) A statement of the specific reasons for the action in the Statement of Issues.

(b) A description of the local contracting agency’s rights and responsibilities concerning the appeal procedure described herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10397.

(a) The department shall establish a contract classification system for purposes of identifying, monitoring, and providing technical assistance to contractors as follows:

(1) Clear contract. This designation shall be given to a contract that is neither a provisional contract, as described in paragraph (2), nor a conditional contract, as described in paragraph (3).

(2) Provisional contract. This designation applies to an agency’s first contract for any particular service or to the contract of an existing contracting agency for a new, modified, or different type of service. The timeframe of a provisional contract is at the discretion of the department and is given to ensure
 that the contracting agency can demonstrate fiscal and programmatic compliance before the contract is designated as a clear contract. The contract status shall be reviewed annually.

(3) Conditional contract. This designation applies to a high-risk contract awarded to a contracting agency that evidences fiscal or programmatic noncompliance, or both fiscal and programmatic noncompliance. A contracting agency with one or more contracts designated as conditional is deemed to be on conditional status with the department for all child care and development program purposes and is subject to any restrictions deemed reasonable to secure compliance. The conditional contract shall include a bill of particulars detailing the items of noncompliance, the standards that must be met to avoid termination of contract and to qualify the agency for clear contract status, and technical assistance plan. Failure to demonstrate substantive progress toward fiscal or
 program compliance within six months of that designation shall constitute a breach of contract and may subject the contract to termination for any applicable cause specified in Section 10398 or 10400, in accordance with Section 10392.

(b) Agencies with conditional contracts shall receive technical assistance from the Child Care and Development Division of the department.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), technical assistance shall be provided to any contracting agency making a written request to its assigned consultant or administrator within 60 days of receipt of the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10398.

(a) A contracting agency that evidences any of the following acts or omissions may have its contract or contracts immediately terminated if there is documented evidence of the acts or omissions, and upon review and recommendation of the general counsel of the department:

(1) Fraud, or conspiracy to defraud.

(2) Misuse or misappropriation of state or federal funds, including a violation of Section 10399.

(3) Embezzlement.

(4) Threats of bodily or other harm to a state official.

(5) Bribery or attempted bribery of a state official.

(6) Unsafe or unhealthy physical environment or facility.

(7) Substantiated abuse or molestation of children.

(8) Failure to report suspected child abuse or molestation.

(9) Theft of supplies, equipment, or food.

(10) Cessation of operations without the permission of the department, or acts or omissions evidencing abandonment of the contract or contracts.

(11) Failure of a program operating pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225) or Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) to fully reimburse a significant number of approved child care
 providers, as determined by the department, within 15 calendar days after the date set in the plan for timely payments to child care providers adopted by the contracting agency pursuant to Section 18226 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, unless the failure is attributable to a delay in receiving apportionments from the state.

(12) Failure of a program operating pursuant to this chapter to pay salaries owed to employees, pay federal payroll tax, or fully reimburse a significant number of child care providers, as determined by the department, affiliated with a contracting agency pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250) for more than 15 days after the employee salaries, federal payroll taxes, or reimbursement payments were due, unless the failure is attributable to a delay in receiving apportionments from the state.

(b) An agency whose contract is
 immediately terminated pursuant to this section retains appeal rights in accordance with Section 10392.

(c) Notwithstanding any service provision in the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), a notice of immediate termination shall be served on the contracting agency by personal service or at the last address on file with the department, by overnight mail or certified mail. Service may be proved in the manner authorized in a civil action. Service by mail is complete at the time of deposit.

(d) The department shall advise child care and development contractors of the provisions of this section within 30 working days of the effective date of the act amending this section during the 2013–14 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10399.

(a) An agency that has in place or places a person in a position of fiscal responsibility or control who has been convicted of a crime involving misuse or misappropriation of state or federal funds, or a state or federal crime involving moral turpitude, may have its contract immediately terminated pursuant to Section 10398 if there is documented evidence of the conviction, and upon review and recommendation of the general counsel of the department.

(b) For purposes of this section, “position of fiscal responsibility or control” includes any authority to direct or control expenditure of, or any access to, state or federal child care and development funds received pursuant to this chapter whether that authority or access is conferred based
 on the person’s status as an employee, director, manager, board member, or volunteer, or based on any other status.

(c) If the agency provides evidence to the department, before the effective date given in the notice of immediate termination, that the convicted person has been removed from the position of fiscal responsibility or control and provides assurance that the person will not be returned to a position of fiscal responsibility or control, the department shall withdraw the termination action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10400.

Except for causes listed in Sections 10398 and 10399, termination of a child care and development contract shall not occur without good cause and without notice as described in Section 10396 at least 90 days before the effective date given in the notice of termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10401.

Actions as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10392 shall remain in effect during the appeal process. However, local contracting agencies may continue to operate under the contract during an appeal of termination, unless the action is an immediate termination action taken pursuant to Sections 10398 and 10399, in which case a contracting agency shall not continue to operate under the contract after the effective date given in the notice of immediate termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10402.

All contracts entered into by the department pursuant to Section 10268.5 shall contain a complete description of the appeal procedures provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 25. Building a Better Early Care and Education System [10420. - 10429.5.]

10420.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Building a Better Early Care and Education System Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10420.5.

(a) The purpose of this chapter is to promote quality, access, and stability in the early care and education system by authorizing an appropriate unit of family child care providers to choose a provider organization to act as their unit’s representative on all matters specified in this chapter. It is also the purpose of this chapter to promote full communication between family child care providers and the state by permitting a provider organization certified as the representative of family child care providers to meet and confer with the state regarding matters within the scope of representation and other areas as mutually agreed upon in negotiations.

(b) This chapter is not intended to change the family child care providers’ status as
 employees or independent business owners or classify family child care providers as public employees.

(c) This chapter is not intended to change or interfere with the requirements governing licensing or enforcement thereof set forth in the California Child Day Care Facilities Act (Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70), Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90), and Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 1597.30) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code).

(d) This chapter is not intended to interfere with the ability of the state, the department, another department or agency, or a political subdivision of the state to comply with the requirements of federal grants or federal funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10421.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Certified provider organization” means a provider organization that is certified by the Public Employment Relations Board as the representative of family child care providers in an appropriate unit after a proceeding under Section 10424.

(b) (1) “Family child care provider” or “provider” means a child care provider who participates in a state-funded early care and education program as specified in subdivision (f) and is either of the following:

(A) An individual who operates a family child care home, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, and who is licensed
 pursuant to the requirement in Section 1596.80 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) An individual who provides early care and education in their own home or in the home of the child receiving care and is exempt from licensing requirements pursuant to Section 1596.792 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) An assistant-provider, a volunteer, or any other individual who works or volunteers for a family child care home, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, and who does not possess a license pursuant to Section 1596.80 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be considered a family child care provider for purposes of this chapter. However, an individual who, separate and apart from that work or volunteer service within a family child care home, participates in a state-funded early care and education program and provides care that is exempt from licensing requirements
 pursuant to Section 1596.792 of the Health and Safety Code shall be considered a family child care provider for purposes of this chapter in their capacity as the provider of this separate, license-exempt care.

(c) “Mediation” means an effort by an impartial third party to assist in reconciling a dispute regarding matters within the scope of representation between representatives of the Governor and the certified provider organization through interpretation, suggestion, and advice.

(d) “Provider organization” means an organization that has all of the following characteristics:

(1) Includes family child care providers as members.

(2) Has as one of its main purposes the representation of family child care providers in their relations with public or private
 entities in California concerning the terms of their participation in state-funded early care and education programs.

(3) Is not an entity that contracts with the state or a county to administer or process payments for a state-funded early care and education program.

(4) Its organizational bylaws or other internal governing documents give family child care providers the right to be members of the organization and to participate in the democratic control of the organization.

(e) “Public Employment Relations Board” or “board” means the Public Employment Relations Board established pursuant to Section 3541 of the Government Code. The powers and duties of the board described in Section 3541.3 of the Government Code, and the respective implementing regulations, shall apply, as appropriate, to this chapter to the extent
 those procedures are not inconsistent with the procedures specified in this chapter. If a provision of this chapter is the same or substantially the same as that contained in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500), Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512), or Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, it shall be interpreted and applied in accordance with the regulations and judicial interpretations of the provision in those statutes. For exclusive purposes of this chapter, any reference in Section 3541.3 of the Government Code to “employee” or “employees” shall be deemed to refer to a “provider” as defined in subdivision (b), any references to “employee organizations” shall be deemed to refer to “provider organizations” as defined in subdivision (d), any references to “exclusive representative” shall be deemed to refer to “certified provider organization” as defined in subdivision (a), and any references to “employer” shall be deemed to refer solely to
 the department, any other agency, department, contractor, subcontractor, or any political subdivision of the state administering a state-funded early care and education program. The board may also adopt, amend, or repeal all rules and regulations necessary to carry out this chapter as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption, amendment, or repeal of regulations pursuant to this subdivision is conclusively presumed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare within the meaning of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(f) “State-funded early care and education program” means a program administered by the department, another department or agency, or a political subdivision of the state, including programs
 established subsequent to the enactment of this chapter, to subsidize early learning and care for children, but does not include the public education system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10421.5.

The state action antitrust exemption to the application of federal and state antitrust laws shall apply to the activities of family child care providers and their representatives authorized under this chapter.
